Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2104.01
Art media, defined.

Art media means the materials used by an individual to create tangible representations of private experiences, thoughts, and emotions. Art media includes, but is not limited to, traditional art making materials such as paint, clay, drawing implements, photography, and collage, as well as, crafts, found objects, and nontraditional materials that can be utilized to make personal art.

Laws 2024, LB605, § 6.